eng/eng_verbs.lexc
! eng_verbs.lexc !
!
! Author(s): Damir Cavar, 
! Date: 10/27/2015
!
! Purpose: English verbs
!
! Copyright 2015 by Damir Cavar, 
!
! Licensed under the Apache License, Version 2.0 (the "License");
! you may not use this file except in compliance with the License.
! You may obtain a copy of the License at
!
!   http://www.apache.org/licenses/LICENSE-2.0
!
! Unless required by applicable law or agreed to in writing, software
! distributed under the License is distributed on an "AS IS" BASIS,
! WITHOUT WARRANTIES OR CONDITIONS OF ANY KIND, either express or implied.
! See the License for the specific language governing permissions and
! limitations under the License.



Multichar_Symbols +N +V +Aux +Art +Def +Indef +Pres +PastPart +Past +PresPart +1P +2P +3P +Sg +Pl +Countable +Uncountable +Mass +NELanguage +NECountry +Arch



LEXICON Vinf
+V:0             #;
+V+3P+Sg:^s      #;
+V+PresPart:^ing #;
+V+Past:^ed      #;
+V+PastPart:^ed  #;


LEXICON Vinf2
+V:0             #;
+V+3P+Sg:^s      #;
+V+PresPart:^ing #;


LEXICON Vinf3
+V:0             #;
+V+PresPart:^ing #;

LEXICON Root
abide Vinf; !
alight Vinf; !
arise Vinf2;
awake Vinf2;
backslide Vinf2;
bear Vinf2;
beat Vinf2;
become Vinf2;
begin Vinf2;
bend Vinf2;
bet Vinf2;
bid Vinf2;            ! (offer amount)
bind Vinf2;
bite Vinf2;
bleed Vinf2;
blow Vinf2;
break Vinf2;
breed Vinf2;
bring Vinf2;
broadcast Vinf; !
browbeat Vinf2;
build Vinf2;
burn Vinf; ! 
burst Vinf2;
bust Vinf; !
buy Vinf2;
cast Vinf2;
catch Vinf2;
choose Vinf2;
cling Vinf2;
clothe Vinf; !
come Vinf2;
cost Vinf2;
creep Vinf2;
crossbreed Vinf2;
cut Vinf2;
daydream Vinf; !
deal Vinf2;
dig Vinf2;
disprove Vinf; !
dive Vinf; ! (jump head-first, scuba diving)
draw Vinf2;
dream Vinf; !
drink Vinf2;
drive Vinf2;
dwell Vinf; !
eat Vinf2;
fall Vinf2;
feed Vinf2;
feel Vinf2;
fight Vinf2;
find Vinf2;
fit Vinf; !  (tailor, change size)  (be right size)
flee Vinf2;
fling Vinf2;
fly Vinf2;
forbid Vinf2;
forecast Vinf2;
forego Vinf2; ! (also forgo)
foresee Vinf2;
foretell Vinf2;
forget Vinf2;
forgive Vinf2;
forsake Vinf2;
freeze Vinf2;
frostbite Vinf2;
get Vinf2;
give Vinf2;
go Vinf3;
grind Vinf2;
grow Vinf2;
hand-feed Vinf2;
handwrite Vinf2;
hang Vinf2;
have Vinf2;
hear Vinf2;
hew Vinf; !
hide Vinf2;
hit Vinf2;
hold Vinf2;
hurt Vinf2;
inbreed Vinf2;
inlay Vinf2;
input Vinf; !
interbreed Vinf2;
interweave Vinf; !
interwind Vinf2;
jerry-build Vinf2;
keep Vinf2;
kneel Vinf; !
knit Vinf; !
know Vinf2;
lay Vinf2;
lead Vinf2;
lean Vinf; !
leap Vinf; !
learn Vinf; !
leave Vinf2;
lend Vinf2;
let Vinf2;
lie Vinf2;
lie Vinf; ! (not tell truth)
light Vinf; !
lip-read Vinf2;
lose Vinf2;
make  Vinf2;
mean Vinf2;
meet Vinf2;
miscast Vinf2;
misdeal Vinf2;
misdo Vinf2;
mishear Vinf2;
mislay Vinf2;
mislead Vinf2;
mislearn Vinf; !
misread Vinf2;
misset Vinf2;
misspeak Vinf2;
misspell Vinf; !
misspend Vinf2;
mistake Vinf2;
misteach Vinf2;
misunderstand Vinf2;
miswrite Vinf2;
mow Vinf; !
offset Vinf2;
outbid Vinf2;
outbreed Vinf2;
outdo Vinf2;
outdraw Vinf2;
outdrink Vinf2;
outdrive Vinf2;
outfight Vinf2;
outfly Vinf2;
outgrow Vinf2;
outleap Vinf; !
outlie Vinf; ! (not tell truth)
outride Vinf2;
outrun Vinf2;
outsell Vinf2;
outshine Vinf; !
outshoot Vinf2;
outsing Vinf2;
outsit Vinf2;
outsleep Vinf2;
outsmell Vinf; !
outspeak Vinf2;
outspeed Vinf2;
outspend Vinf2;
outswear Vinf2;
outswim Vinf2;
outthink Vinf2;
outthrow Vinf2;
outwrite Vinf2;
overbid Vinf2;
overbreed Vinf2;
overbuild Vinf2;
overbuy Vinf2;
overcome Vinf2;
overdo Vinf2;
overdraw Vinf2;
overdrink Vinf2;
overeat Vinf2;
overfeed Vinf2;
overhang Vinf2;
overhear Vinf2;
overlay Vinf2;
overpay Vinf2;
override Vinf2;
overrun Vinf2;
oversee Vinf2;
oversell Vinf2;
oversew Vinf; !
overshoot Vinf2;
oversleep Vinf2;
overspeak Vinf2;
overspend Vinf2;
overspill Vinf2;
overtake Vinf2;
overthink Vinf2;
overthrow Vinf2;
overwind Vinf2;
overwrite Vinf2;
partake Vinf2;
pay Vinf2;
plead Vinf; !
prebuild Vinf2;
predo Vinf2;
premake Vinf2;
prepay Vinf2;
presell Vinf2;
preset Vinf2;
preshrink Vinf2;
proofread Vinf2;
prove Vinf; !
put Vinf2;
quick-freeze Vinf2;
quit Vinf; ! [?]
read Vinf2;
reawake Vinf2;
rebid Vinf2;
rebind Vinf2;
rebroadcast Vinf; !
rebuild Vinf2;
recast Vinf2;
recut Vinf2;
redeal Vinf2;
redo Vinf2;
redraw Vinf2;
refit Vinf; ! [?] (replace parts)  (retailor)
regrind Vinf2;
regrow Vinf2;
rehang Vinf2;
rehear Vinf2;
reknit Vinf; !
relay Vinf; ! (for example tiles) (pass along)
relearn Vinf; !
relight Vinf; !
remake Vinf2;
repay Vinf2;
reread Vinf2;
rerun Vinf2;
resell Vinf2;
resend Vinf2;
reset Vinf2;
resew Vinf; !
retake Vinf2;
reteach Vinf2;
retear Vinf2;
retell Vinf2;
rethink Vinf2;
retread Vinf2;
retrofit Vinf; !
rewake Vinf; !
rewear Vinf2;
reweave Vinf; !
rewed Vinf; !
rewet Vinf; ! [?] 
rewin Vinf2;
rewind Vinf2;
rewrite Vinf2;
rid Vinf2;
ride Vinf2;
ring Vinf2;
rise Vinf2;
roughcast Vinf2;
run Vinf2;
sand-cast Vinf2;
saw Vinf; !
say Vinf2;
see Vinf2;
seek Vinf2;
sell Vinf2;
send Vinf2;
set Vinf2;
sew Vinf; !
shake Vinf2;
shave Vinf; !
shear Vinf; !
shed Vinf2;
shine Vinf; !
shit Vinf; !
shoot Vinf2;
show Vinf2;
shrink Vinf2;
shut Vinf2;
sight-read Vinf2;
sing Vinf2;
sink Vinf2;
sit Vinf2;
slay Vinf; ! (kill)
sleep Vinf2;
slide Vinf2;
sling Vinf2;
slink Vinf; !
slit Vinf2;
smell Vinf; !
sneak Vinf; !
sow Vinf; !
speak Vinf2;
speed Vinf; !
spell Vinf; !
spend Vinf2;
spill Vinf; !
spin Vinf2;
spit Vinf2;
split Vinf2;
spoil Vinf; !
spoon-feed Vinf2;
spread Vinf2;
spring Vinf2;
stand Vinf2;
steal Vinf2;
stick Vinf2;
sting Vinf2;
stink Vinf2;
strew Vinf; !
stride Vinf2;
strike Vinf2; ! (delete)  (hit)
string Vinf2;
strive Vinf; !
sublet Vinf2;
sunburn Vinf; !
swear Vinf2;
sweat Vinf; !
sweep Vinf2;
swell Vinf; !
swim Vinf2;
swing Vinf2;
take Vinf2;
teach Vinf2;
tear Vinf2;
telecast Vinf2;
tell Vinf2;
test-drive Vinf2;
test-fly Vinf2;
think Vinf2;
throw Vinf2;
thrust Vinf2;
tread Vinf2;
typecast Vinf2;
typeset Vinf2;
typewrite Vinf2;
unbend Vinf2;
unbind Vinf2;
unclothe Vinf; !
underbid Vinf2;
undercut Vinf2;
underfeed Vinf2;
undergo Vinf2;
underlie Vinf2;
undersell Vinf2;
underspend Vinf2;
understand Vinf2;
undertake Vinf2;
underwrite Vinf2;
undo Vinf2;
unfreeze Vinf2;
unhang Vinf2;
unhide Vinf2;
unknit Vinf; !
unlearn Vinf; !
unsew Vinf; !
unsling Vinf2;
unspin Vinf2;
unstick Vinf2;
unstring Vinf2;
unweave Vinf; !
unwind Vinf2;
uphold Vinf2;
upset Vinf2;
wake Vinf; !
waylay Vinf2;
wear Vinf2;
weave Vinf; !
wed Vinf; !
weep Vinf2;
wet Vinf; ! [?]
whet Vinf; !   REGULAR	whetted	whetted
win Vinf2;
wind Vinf2;
withdraw Vinf2;
withhold Vinf2;
withstand Vinf2;
wring Vinf2;
write Vinf2;
